Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 3. Nonwork Related Disability Benefits.

§ 51.1-1109.
Applicability of article.

The provisions of this article shall apply only with respect to the disability programs providing disability benefits for disabilities not resulting from work-related injuries.

History.

1998, c. 774.

§ 51.1-1110.
Short-term disability benefit.

Except as provided in subsection D of §

51.1-1103

, short-term disability benefits for participating employees shall commence upon the expiration of a seven-calendar-day waiting period. The waiting period shall commence the first day of a disability or of maternity leave. If an employee returns to work for one day or less during the seven-calendar-day waiting period but cannot continue to work, the periods worked shall not be considered to have interrupted the seven-calendar-day waiting period. Additionally, the seven-calendar-day waiting period shall not be considered to be interrupted if the employee works 20 hours or less during the waiting period. Short-term disability benefits payable as the result of a catastrophic disability or major chronic condition shall not require a waiting period.

Except as provided in subsections C and E of this section and §

51.1-1131

, short-term disability coverage shall provide income replacement for a percentage of a participating employee’s creditable compensation during the period specified below that an employee is disabled, on maternity leave, or takes periodic absences due to a major chronic condition, as determined by the Board or its designee, based on the number of months of state service as an eligible employee, as follows:

Click to view

For all eligible employees commencing employment or reemployment on or after July 1, 2009, except as provided in subsections B and E of this section and §

51.1-1131

, short-term disability coverage shall provide income replacement for (i) 60 percent of a participating employee’s creditable compensation for the first 60 months of continuous state service after employment or reemployment and (ii) thereafter, a percentage of a participating employee’s creditable compensation during the periods that he is disabled, on maternity leave, or takes periodic absences due to a major chronic condition, based on the number of months of continuous state service, as determined by the Board or its designee, as follows:

Click to view

Creditable compensation during periods an employee receives short-term disability benefits shall include general salary increases awarded during the period of short-term disability coverage.

An employee’s disability credits may be used, on a day for day basis, to extend the period an employee receives short-term disability benefits paid at 100 percent of replacement of creditable compensation.

Short-term disability benefits shall be payable only during periods of (i) total disability, (ii) partial disability, (iii) maternity leave, or (iv) periodic absences due to a major chronic condition as defined by the Board or its designee.

Work days of 100% Work days of 80% Work days of 60% replacement replacement replacement Months of of creditable of creditable of creditable state service compensation compensation compensation Less than 60 5 20 100 60 to 119 25 25 75 120 to 179 25 50 50 180 or more 25 75 25

Work days of 100% Work days of 80% Work days of 60% replacement replacement replacement Months of of creditable of creditable of creditable state service compensation compensation compensation 60 to 119 25 25 75 120 to 179 25 50 50 180 or more 25 75 25

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889; 2004, c. 1019; 2010, c. 750; 2012, c. 417.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 1019, which added subsection F, in cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to short-term disability benefits for which payment began prior to July 1, 2004.”

The 1999 amendment

added the last two sentences of subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “or its designee” following “the Board,” inserted “state” preceding “service as an,” and inserted “state” following “Months of” in the first column head”; substituted “a day for day” for “an hour for hour” in subsection D; and deleted the former last sentence of subsection E which read: “Short-term disability benefits shall be payable for each instance of absence due to a major chronic condition, as defined by the Board or its designee, after the participating employee has satisfied one seven-calendar-day waiting period in each calendar year.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “the first day of a disability or” for “on the day following the commencement of a disability or a period,” and inserted “general” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1019, in subsection A, substituted “20” for “twenty” in the next-to-last sentence and “Short-term” for “Short term” in the last sentence and added subsection F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 750 inserted “Except as provided in subsection D of §

51.1-1103

” at the beginning of subsection A; substituted “subsection C and E of this subsection” for “subsection D” near the beginning of subsection B; inserted present subsection C, and redesignated former subsections C through E as present subsections D through F; and deleted former subsection F, which read: “Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, short-term disability benefits for elective medical procedures, including but not limited to surgery, shall not be payable during the first six months of employment or reemployment as an eligible employee without approval of the employer. The employee shall give reasonable advance notice to his immediate supervisor and the employer shall not unreasonably withhold authorization for such medically necessary absences.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 417, effective March 30, 2012, substituted “during the periods that he is disabled, on maternity leave, or takes periodic absences due to a major chronic condition, based on the number of months of continuous state service, as determined by the Board or its designee, as follows:” for “during the periods specified below, based on the number of months of continuous state service, that an employee is disabled, on maternity leave, or takes periodic absences due to a major chronic condition:” in subsection C.

§ 51.1-1111.
Successive periods of short-term disability.

A participating employee’s disability which is related or due to the same cause or causes as a prior disability for which short-term disability benefits were paid shall be deemed to be a continuation of the prior disability if the employee returns to his position on an active employment basis for less than 45 consecutive calendar days. If a participating employee, after receiving short-term disability benefits, immediately returns to work for less than 45 consecutive calendar days and cannot continue to work, the days worked shall be deemed to have interrupted the short-term disability benefits period, and such days worked shall not be counted for purposes of determining the maximum period for which the participating employee is eligible to receive short-term disability benefits. Days of work arranged pursuant to vocational, rehabilitation, or return-to-work programs shall not be counted in determining the duration of the period of the employee’s return to work.

If a participating employee returns to his position on an active employment basis for 45 consecutive calendar days or longer, any succeeding period of disability shall constitute a new period of short-term disability.

The period of 45 days referred to in subsections A and B shall be consecutive calendar days that the participating employee is (i) actively at work and (ii) fully released to return to work full time, full duty. The Retirement System shall develop policies and procedures to administer the effects of the 45-day period in connection with participants who are deemed to have a major chronic condition.

History.

1998, c. 774; 2010, c. 750.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 750, in subsection A, substituted “45 consecutive calendar days” for “(i) fourteen consecutive calendar days or (ii) twenty-eight consecutive calendar days if the short-term disability is due to a major chronic condition, as defined by the Board or its designee, requiring periodic absences” at the end of the first sentence, and inserted the second sentence; deleted the last sentence in subsection B, which formerly read: “However, if the cause of the participating employee’s disability is a major chronic condition, as defined by the Board or its designee, requiring periodic absences, and the participating employee returns to his position on an active employment basis for more than twenty-eight consecutive calendar days, any succeeding period of disability shall constitute a new period of short-term disability.”; and inserted subsection C.

§ 51.1-1112.
Long-term disability benefit.

Except as provided in subsection D of §

51.1-1103

, long-term disability benefits for participating employees shall commence upon the expiration of the maximum period for which the participating employee is eligible to receive short-term disability benefits under §

51.1-1110

.

Except as provided in subsection D and §

51.1-1131

, long-term disability benefits shall provide income replacement in an amount equal to 60 percent of a participating employee’s creditable compensation.

Creditable compensation during periods an employee receives long-term disability benefits shall (i) not include salary increases awarded during the period covered by long-term disability benefits and (ii) be increased annually by an amount recommended by the actuary of the Virginia Sickness and Disability Program and approved by the Board.

An employee’s disability credits shall be used, on a day-for-day basis, to extend the period an employee receives long-term disability benefits paid at 100 percent of replacement of creditable compensation.

Long-term disability benefits shall be payable only during periods of (i) total disability or (ii) partial disability.

Unless otherwise directed, to be eligible for benefits under this section, the employee must apply for Social Security disability benefits.

An employee who is approved for disability benefits on or after the date that is five years prior to his normal retirement date shall be eligible for five years of disability benefits before the employee is required to retire under a service retirement. The five years includes short-term disability and long-term disability.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889; 2003, c. 13; 2004, c. 96; 2005, c. 419; 2006, cc. 404, 405; 2010, c. 750; 2011, c. 880.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “shall be used, on a day for day” for “may be used, on an hour for hour” in subsection D.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889, in the first and last sentences of subsection A, substituted “the first day” for “on the day following the commencement,” and added subsection F.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 13 substituted “14” for “fourteen” in the third sentence of subsection A, substituted “60” for “sixty” in subsection B, and substituted “Virginia Sickness and Disability Program” for “Virginia Retirement System” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 96 added “Unless otherwise directed” at the beginning of subsection F.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 419 substituted “125-work-day” for “180 calendar day” four times in subsection A.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 404, in subsection A, substituted “of the maximum period for which the participating employee is eligible to receive short-term disability benefits under §

51.1-1110

” for “a 125-work-day waiting period. The waiting period shall commence the first day of the disability,” substituted “the period in which he is receiving short-term disability benefits” for “such 125-work day waiting period” in the second sentence and substituted “short-term disability benefits” for “125-work day waiting” in the present second and third sentences and substituted “period” for “disability” in the present third sentence.

The 2006 amendment by c. 405 added subsection G.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 750, in subsection A, inserted “Except as provided in subsection D of §

51.1-1103

” at the beginning of the first sentence, and deleted the second and third sentences which formerly read: “If an employee returns to work for 14 or fewer consecutive calendar days during the period in which he is receiving short-term disability benefits and cannot continue to work, the periods worked shall not be deemed to have interrupted the short-term disability benefits period. However, if the cause of the participating employee’s disability is a major chronic condition, as defined by the Board or its designee, the short-term disability benefits period is cumulative from the first day of the period and can be interrupted by periods of active employment.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 880, substituted “the date that is five years prior to his normal retirement date shall be eligible for five years of disability benefits” for “age 60 shall be eligible for up to a maximum of five years of disability benefits” in subsection G.

§ 51.1-1113.
Successive periods of long-term disability.

A participating employee’s disability which is related or due to the same cause or causes as a prior disability for which long-term disability benefits were paid shall be deemed to be a continuation of the prior disability if the employee returns to a position on an active employment basis for less than 125 consecutive work days. Days of work arranged pursuant to vocational, rehabilitation, or return-to-work programs shall not be counted in determining the duration of the period of the employee’s return to work.

If a participating employee returns to a position on an active employment basis for 125 consecutive work days or longer, any succeeding period of disability shall constitute a new period of disability.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2004, c. 97; 2005, c. 419.

The 1999 amendment

deleted “long term” preceding “disability” in subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 97 substituted “a” for “his” in the first sentence of subsection A and in subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 419, in subsections A and B, substituted “125” for “180” and “work” for “calendar.”

§ 51.1-1114.
Adjustments to disability benefits.

Disability benefit payments shall be offset by an amount equal to any sums payable to a participating employee from the following sources:

During the first 12 months the employee receives disability benefits, an amount equal to the employee’s wages and salary from any employment times the creditable compensation replacement percentage;

After the first 12 months the employee receives disability benefits, an amount equal to 70 percent of the employee’s wages and salary from any employment;

Disability payments from the Social Security Administration, local government disability benefits, federal or civil service disability benefits, or other similar governmental disability program benefits received by the employee or his family as a result of the qualifying disability;

Benefits received from any other group insurance contract provided by the Commonwealth for the purpose of providing income replacement; and

Benefits paid under any compulsory benefits law.Notwithstanding the foregoing, disability benefit payments shall not be offset by military disability benefits payable to a participating employee.

If the plan administrator deems a participating employee to be eligible for benefits from any of the sources listed in subdivisions A 3, A 4, and A 5, the plan administrator may direct the participating employee to apply for those benefits and to pursue whatever additional steps are necessary to obtain the benefits. If a participating employee fails or refuses to pursue the available benefits as directed by the plan administrator, disability benefit payments may be offset by amounts from any of the sources listed in subdivisions A 3, A 4, and A 5 for which a participating employee is deemed eligible by the plan administrator as if the employee received such amounts. However, if the employee has applied for such benefits, and has reapplied and appealed denials of the claim as requested by the administrator of the plan, and the claim is not approved, the employee’s disability payments shall not be reduced thereby.

If a participating employee’s disability benefit payments are reduced as the result of payments from sources listed in subdivisions A 3, A 4, and A 5 or pursuant to subsection B, the employee’s disability benefits shall not thereafter be further reduced on account of cost-of-living increases in payments from such sources.

Participating employees shall be required to repay, with interest to the Board or their employer, any overpayments of disability benefits on account of the failure of the employee to provide the Board or its designee with information necessary to make any of the reductions required to be made under this article.

Any payment to a participating employee that is later determined by the Board or by the employer to have been procured on the basis of any false statement or falsification of any record knowingly made by or on behalf of the member, or the employee’s failure to make any required report of change in disability status, may be recovered from the employee by the Board, with interest, either by way of a credit against future payments due the employee, his survivor and beneficiaries or by an action at law against the employee.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889; 2003, c. 5; 2004, c. 99; 2006, cc. 778, 841; 2012, c. 417.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “seventy percent” for “70 percent” in subdivision A 2; in subsections B and C, substituted “A 3, A 4, and A 5” for “A 3 through A 5”; in subsection D, inserted “or their employer” and inserted “or its designee”; and inserted “or by the employer” in subsection E.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889, in subdivision A 1, substituted “an amount equal to” for “the portion of” and “times the creditable compensation replacement percentage” for “that causes the total of the disability benefits and wages and salary to exceed 100 percent of creditable compensation,” in subdivision A 3, deleted “Social security” preceding “disability payments,” and inserted “from the Social Security Administration” thereafter, substituted “and has reapplied and appealed denials of the claim as requested by the administrator of the plan and the claim” for “and their payment” in subsection B, and inserted “with interest” in subsection E.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 5, in subsection A, substituted “12” for “twelve” in subdivisions 1 and 2, and inserted “Except as provided in subsection F” and “military disability benefits, local government disability benefits, federal civil service disability benefits” in subdivision 3; and added subsection F.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 99 substituted “70” for “seventy” in subdivision A 2 and inserted “his survivor and beneficiaries” in subsection E.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 778 and 841 are identical, and in subsection B,
substituted the language beginning “If the plan administrator deems” and ending “by the plan administrator, disability” for “Disability” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “may” for “shall” and inserted “deemed” and “by the plan administrator.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 417, effective March 30, 2012, substituted “Disability payments from the Social Security Administration, local government disability benefits, federal or civil service” for “Except as provided in subsection F, disability payments from the Social Security Administration, military disability benefits, local government disability benefits, federal civil service” in subdivision A 3, added the paragraph following subdivision A 5, and deleted former subsection F.

§ 51.1-1115.
Rehabilitation incentive.

Disability benefits payable to a participating employee who fails to cooperate with a rehabilitation program prescribed for the employee shall be decreased by fifty percent of the amounts otherwise payable to such employee.

History.

1998, c. 774.

§ 51.1-1116.
Cessation of disability benefits.

If not sooner terminated due to the end of the period of disability coverage as provided in subsection E of §

51.1-1110

or subsection F of §

51.1-1112

, disability benefits shall cease to be paid to a participating employee upon the first to occur of the following:

The date of death of the participating employee;

The participating employee’s normal retirement date if the employee is a member of the retirement system or (ii) the date the employee attains age sixty-five if the employee is not a member of the retirement system; or
2. (i) The participating employee’s normal retirement date if the employee is a member of the retirement system or (ii) the date the employee attains age sixty-five if the employee is not a member of the retirement system; or

The effective date of the participating full-time employee’s service retirement under any provision of this title.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2001, c. 694; 2011, c. 722.

The 1999 amendment

inserted “full-time” in subdivision 4.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 694 deleted former subdivision 3, which formerly read: “After the first twelve months of long-term disability benefits, the date the participating employee’s wages and salary from any employment exceed eighty-five percent of his predisability earnings; or,” and redesignated former subdivision 4 as present subdivision 3.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 722 substituted “subsection F of §

51.1-1112

” for “subsection E of §

51.1-1112

” in the introductory language.

§ 51.1-1117.
Service retirement of participating full-time employees receiving disability benefits.

A participating full-time employee receiving disability benefits who is a vested member of the retirement system shall be eligible for service retirement under any provision of this title for which the employee is otherwise eligible. Such employee shall be authorized to elect any option for the payment of his retirement allowance provided under subsection A of §

51.1-165

for which the employee is otherwise eligible.

The average final compensation of any participating full-time employee taking a service retirement under any provision of this title shall be equal to his creditable compensation on the date of the commencement of the disability increased by an amount recommended by the program actuary and approved by the Board, from the date of the commencement of the disability to the date of retirement.

The creditable service of a participating full-time employee taking service retirement pursuant to this section shall include periods during which the employee received disability benefits.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2004, c. 98; 2011, c. 722.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsections A, B, and C, inserted “full-time” following “participating.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 98, in subsection B, substituted “program, actuary” for “actuary of the Virginia Retirement System.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 722 rewrote the first sentences in subsections A and B, and substituted “service” for “normal” preceding “retirement pursuant to this section” in subsection C.

§ 51.1-1118.
Survivor benefits.

If a participating full-time employee who is a member of the retirement system dies during periods he is receiving disability benefits, survivor benefits shall be payable to the extent provided in subsections A and B of §

51.1-162

.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144.

The 1999 amendment

inserted “full-time” near the beginning of the paragraph.